Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-353] Use of revenues derived from
project agreement. The department shall have the right to appropriate,
apply, or expend the revenues derived with respect to the project agreement for
a project for the following purposes:

(1) To pay when due all special purpose revenue
bonds, premiums if any, and interest thereon, for the payment of which the
revenues are or have been pledged, charged, or otherwise encumbered, including
reserves therefor; and

(2) To the extent not paid by the project party to provide
for all expenses of administration, operations, and maintenance of the project,
including reserves therefor.

Unless and until adequate provision has been
made for the foregoing purposes, the department shall not transfer the revenues
derived from the project agreement to the general fund of the State. [L 2012, c
147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next